Washington statutes.
RCW 7.07.080

Mediator's disclosure of conflicts of interest—Background.

(1) Before accepting a mediation, an individual who is requested to serve as a mediator shall:

(a) Make an inquiry that is reasonable under the circumstances to determine whether there are any known facts that a reasonable individual would consider likely to affect the impartiality of the mediator, including a financial or personal interest in the outcome of the mediation and an existing or past relationship with a mediation party or foreseeable participant in the mediation; and

(b) Disclose any such known fact to the mediation parties as soon as is practical before accepting a mediation.

(2) If a mediator learns any fact described in subsection (1)(a) of this section after accepting a mediation, the mediator shall disclose it as soon as is practicable.

(3) At the request of a mediation party, an individual who is requested to serve as a mediator shall disclose the mediator's qualifications to mediate a dispute.

(4) A person that violates subsection (1) or (2) of this section is precluded by the violation from asserting a privilege under RCW 7.07.030.

(5) Subsections (1) through (3) of this section do not apply to an individual acting as a judge.

(6) This chapter does not require that a mediator have a special qualification by background or profession.

[ 2005 c 172 s 9.]